Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
702

GENERAL
PRINCIPLES OF PENAL LIABILITY

Section

702-200 Requirement of voluntary act or
voluntary omission

702-201 "Voluntary act" defined

702-202 Voluntary act includes possession

702-203 Penal liability based on an omission

702-204 State of mind required

702-205 Elements of an offense

702-206 Definitions of states of mind

702-207 Specified state of mind applies to all
elements

702-208 Substitutes for negligence,
recklessness, and

knowledge

702-209 Conditional intent

702-210 Requirement of wilfulness satisfied by
acting

knowingly

702-211 State of mind as determinant of grade or
class of a

particular offense

702-212 When state of mind requirements are
inapplicable to

violations and to crimes defined by
statutes other

than this Code

702-213 Effect of absolute liability in reducing
grade of

offense to violation

702-214 Causal relationship between conduct and
result

702-215 Intentional or knowing causation;
different result

from that intended or contemplated

702-216 Reckless or negligent causation;
different result

from that within the risk

702-217 Causation in offenses of absolute liability

702-218 Ignorance or mistake as a defense

702-219 Ignorance or mistake; reduction in grade
and class

of the offense

702-220 Ignorance or mistake of law; belief that
conduct not

legally prohibited

702-221 Liability for conduct of another

702-222 Liability for conduct of another;
complicity

702-223 Liability for conduct of another;
complicity with

respect to the result

702-224 Liability for conduct of another;
exemption from

complicity

702-225 Liability for conduct of another;
incapacity of

defendant; failure to prosecute or
convict or

immunity of other person

702-226 Liability for conduct of another;
multiple

convictions; different degrees

702-227 Penal liability of corporations and
unincorporated

associations

702-228 Liability of persons acting, or under a
duty to act,

in behalf of corporations or
unincorporated

associations

702-229 Definitions relating to corporations and

unincorporated associations

702-230 Intoxication

702-231 Duress

702-232 Military orders

702-233 Consent; general

702-234 Consent to bodily injury

702-235 Ineffective consent

702-236 De minimis infractions

702-237 Entrapment

Note

L 2001, c 91, §4 purports to amend this chapter.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next